Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1001
Act, how cited; termination.

Sections 37-1001 to 37-1008 shall be known and may be cited as the Trail Development Assistance Act. The Trail Development Assistance Act shall terminate January 1, 2010, and any money in the Trail Development Assistance Fund at such time shall be transferred to the General Fund.

Laws 1991, LB 714, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1501;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 376;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 99.
January 1, 2010